Colorado, session 2026A, HB1160.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of law for the
fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado 2025,
section 2 of chapter 426, (SB 25-206), amend Part XI as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XI
DEPARTMENT OF LAW
(1) ADMINISTRATION
Personal Services 6,902,149 580,431 6,321,718a
(2.8 FTE) (60.2 FTE)
Office of Community
Engagement 1,587,558 1,096,341 491,217b
(14.0 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 9,258,351 2,226,962 1,566,729c 5,227,709d 236,951(I)e
9,596,691 2,308,345 1,623,984c 5,418,752d 245,610(I)e
Short-term Disability 58,188 14,127 8,069c 34,599d 1,393(I)e
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 374,062 90,815 51,872c 222,420d 8,955(I)e
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 8,312,502 2,018,121 1,152,712c 4,942,662d 199,007(I)e
Salary Survey for Classified
Employees 620,440 180,095 202,916c 202,331d 35,098(I)e
Salary Survey for Exempt
Employees 2,531,389 576,394 173,676c 1,746,289d 35,030(I)e
Step Pay 487,416 101,123 57,793c 324,257d 4,243(I)e
PERA Direct Distribution 1,521,258 405,753 210,956c 904,549d
Workers' Compensation 223,238 59,985 28,705c 127,330d 7,218(I)e
Attorney Registration and
Continuing Legal Education 201,977 38,995 5,123c 155,817d 2,042(I)e
Operating Expenses 265,803 24,060 241,743a
Legal Services 250,530 96,678 153,852f
Administrative Law Judge
Services 431 431c
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1160

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Payment to Risk Management
and Property Funds 425,259 114,273 54,680c 242,555d 13,751(I)e
Vehicle Lease Payments 104,090 42,765 16,824c 35,926d 8,575(I)e
99,694 27,869 49,426d 5,575(I)e
Information Technology Asset
Maintenance 1,369,433 367,981 176,081c 781,087d 44,284(I)e
Ralph L. Carr Colorado
Judicial Center Leased Space 3,727,340 1,001,570 479,263c 2,125,974d 120,533(I)e
Lease Payments 607,687 163,801 81,659c 362,227d
Payments to OIT 871,534 234,282 111,624c 497,433d 28,195(I)e
620,678 169,578 79,368c 354,353d 17,379(I)e
Digital Trunk Radio 24,831 13,922 6,449c 4,460d
CORE Operations 11,522 3,097 1,480c 6,572d 373(I)e
Attorney General
Discretionary Fund 5,000 5,000
39,741,988
39,217,389
a These amounts shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S. or the statewide indirect cost
recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from custodial money. Pursuant to Section 24-31-108 (5), C.R.S., custodial money received by the Attorney General is not subject to annual appropriation, but
the expenditure of such money may be indicated in the annual general appropriation act. Expenditures from custodial money do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of
Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
c Of these amounts, $836,137(I) $827,662(I) shall be from custodial money, $42,857 $38,790 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 24-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.,
and $3,508,048 $3,463,930 shall be from various sources of cash funds. Pursuant to Section 24-31-108 (5), C.R.S., custodial money received by the Attorney General is not subject to
annual appropriation, but the expenditure of such money may be indicated in the annual general appropriation act. Expenditures from custodial money do not constitute fiscal year
spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
d These amounts shall be from various sources of reappropriated funds.
e These amounts shall be from the federal Medicaid Fraud Control Program administered by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services and are shown for informational purposes
only.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1160

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
f This amount shall be from the P.O.S.T. Board Cash Fund created in Section 24-31-303 (2)(b), C.R.S.
(2) LEGAL SERVICES TO STATE AGENCIES68
Personal Services 59,437,618
(361.5 FTE)
Operating and Litigation 3,140,463
Indirect Cost Assessment 5,512,959
68,091,040 1,947,137a 66,143,903b
a Of this amount, $1,747,137 shall be from funds that are received for the provision of legal services and that are credited to the Legal Services Cash Fund created in Section 24-31-108
(4), C.R.S., and $200,000 shall be from the Attorney Fees and Costs Account created in Section 24-31-108 (3), C.R.S. The cash funds appropriation from the Legal Services Cash Fund
reflects funds received from state entities for which there is not a corresponding appropriation made in this act for the purchase of legal services. The Attorney General is authorized
to transfer spending authority between cash and reappropriated fund sources appropriated within this section (2), but the Attorney General shall not increase total spending authority
for the line item appropriations within this section (2).
b This amount shall be from funds that are received for the provision of legal services and that are credited to the Legal Services Cash Fund created in Section 24-31-108 (4), C.R.S. The
reappropriated funds appropriation reflects funds received from state agencies for which there is a corresponding appropriation made in this act for the purchase of legal services. The
Attorney General is authorized to transfer spending authority between cash and reappropriated fund sources appropriated within this section (2), but the Attorney General shall not increase
total spending authority for the line item appropriations within this section (2).
(3) CRIMINAL JUSTICE AND APPELLATE
Special Prosecutions Unit 6,655,312 3,608,949 2,029,862a 1,016,501b
(23.6 FTE) (15.4 FTE) (7.4 FTE)
Auto Theft Prevention Grant 222,465 222,465(I)c
(1.0 FTE)
Appellate Unit 6,236,031 5,376,375 859,656d
(41.6 FTE)
Peace Officers Standards and
Training Board Support 6,323,396 6,323,396e
(16.0 FTE)
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1160

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Indirect Cost Assessment 605,785 490,249f 115,536b
20,042,989
a This amount shall be from the Insurance Fraud Cash Fund created in Section 24-31-104.5 (2), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be transferred from the Department of Regulatory Agencies from the Securities Fraud Prosecution line item in the Division of Securities section. These amounts
originate as cash funds from the Division of Securities Cash Fund pursuant to Section 11-51-707 (2), C.R.S.
c This amount shall be transferred from the Department of Public Safety from the Automobile Theft Prevention Authority line item in the Colorado State Patrol section, from a grant
awarded pursuant to Section 42-5-112 (3), C.R.S. This amount is shown for informational purposes only because grant funds are continuously appropriated to the Department pursuant
to Section 24-31-108 (2)(b), C.R.S.
d Of this amount, $774,660 shall be from departmental indirect cost recoveries or the Indirect Costs Excess Recovery Fund created in Section 24-75-1401 (2), C.R.S., and $84,996(I)
shall be transferred from the Department of Public Safety from the State Victims Assistance and Law Enforcement Program line item in the Division of Criminal Justice, Victims
Assistance section, pursuant to Section 24-33.5-506 (1)(c), C.R.S.
e Of this amount, $5,286,630 shall be from the P.O.S.T. Board Cash Fund created in Section 24-31-303 (2)(b), C.R.S., and $1,036,766 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created
in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S.
f Of this amount, $250,295 shall be from the P.O.S.T. Board Cash Fund created in Section 24-31-303 (2)(b), C.R.S., and $239,954 shall be from the Insurance Fraud Cash Fund created
in Section 24-31-104.5 (2), C.R.S.
(4) WATER AND NATURAL RESOURCES
Federal and Interstate Water
Unit 1,496,305 1,496,305
(10.5 FTE)
Defense of the Colorado River
Basin Compact 1,061,699 1,061,699a
(4.5 FTE)
Defense of the Republican
River Compact 110,000 110,000a
35,091 35,091a
Consultant Expenses 475,000 475,000b
549,909 549,909b
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1160

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Comprehensive
Environmental Response,
Compensation and Liability
Act 655,018 655,018c
(3.5 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 54,646 54,646c
3,852,668
a These amounts shall be from the Colorado Water Conservation Board's Litigation Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (2.5)(a), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $425,000 $499,909 shall be from the Colorado Water Conservation Board's Litigation Fund created in Section 37-60-121 (2.5)(a), C.R.S., and $50,000 shall be from
the Attorney Fees and Costs Account created in Section 24-31-108 (3), C.R.S.
c These amounts shall be transferred from the Department of Public Health and Environment from the Transfer to the Department of Law for CERCLA-Related Costs line item in the
Hazardous Materials and Waste Management Division, Contaminated Site Cleanups and Remediation Programs section. These amounts originate as cash funds from the Hazardous
Substance Response Fund and are transferred pursuant to Section 25-16-104.5 (1.7)(a)(III), C.R.S.
(5) CONSUMER PROTECTION, ANTITRUST, AND CIVIL
RIGHTS
Consumer Protection,
Antitrust, and Civil Rights 7,160,749 3,219,315 3,739,440a 201,994b
(44.6 FTE)
Consumer Credit Unit 2,891,920 2,891,920c
(25.0 FTE)
False Claims Recovery Act
Reimbursements 300,000 300,000d
Patterns and Practices 547,820 547,820
(3.2 FTE)
Medicaid Fraud Control Unit 3,815,292 953,823 2,861,469(I)e
(9.0 FTE) (19.0 FTE)
Indirect Cost Assessment 1,164,733 813,439f 23,420b 327,874(I)e
15,880,514
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1160

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
a Of this amount, $2,874,309(I) shall be from custodial money, $583,000 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created in Section 39-28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $282,131 shall be
from the Tobacco Settlement Defense Account of the Tobacco Litigation Settlement Cash Fund created in Section 24-22-115 (2)(a), C.R.S. Pursuant to Section 24-31-108 (5), C.R.S.,
custodial money received by the Attorney General is not subject to annual appropriation but the expenditure of such money may be indicated in the annual general appropriation act.
Expenditures from custodial money do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
b These amounts shall be transferred from the Department of Regulatory Agencies from the Mortgage Broker Consumer Protection line item in the Division of Real Estate. These amounts
originate as cash funds from the Division of Real Estate Cash Fund created in Section 12-10-215 (2)(a)(II)(B), C.R.S., and are transferred pursuant to Section 12-10-719, C.R.S.
c Of this amount, $2,340,823 shall be from the Consumer Credit Unit Cash Fund created in Section 5-2-302 (11)(a), C.R.S., $551,097(I) shall be from the Student Loan Ombudsperson
and Student Loan Servicer Licensing Fund created in Section 5-20-104 (3)(a), C.R.S. Appropriations from the Consumer Credit Unit Cash Fund are shown for informational purposes
only because they are continuously appropriated pursuant Section 5-2-302 (11)(a), C.R.S. and appropriations from the Student Loan Ombudsperson and Student Loan Servicer Licensing
Fund are shown for informational purposes only because they are continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 5-20-104 (3)(c), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the False Claims Recovery Cash Fund created in Section 24-31-1209(1), C.R.S.
e These amounts shall be from the federal Medicaid Fraud Control Program administered by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services and are shown for informational purposes
only.
f Of this amount, $344,136(I) shall be from custodial money, $328,512(I) shall be from the Consumer Credit Cash Fund created in Section 5-2-302 (11)(a), C.R.S., $62,574(I) shall be
from the Student Loan Ombudsperson and Student Loan Servicer Licensing Fund created in Section 5-20-104 (3)(a), C.R.S., $46,930 shall be from the Marijuana Tax Cash Fund created
in Section 29.28.8-501 (1), C.R.S., and $31,287 shall be from the Tobacco Settlement Defense Account of the Tobacco Litigation Settlement Cash Fund created in Section 24-22-115
(2)(a), C.R.S., pursuant to Section 24-31-108 (5), C.R.S. Custodial money received by the Attorney General is not subject to annual appropriation, but the expenditure of such money
may be indicated in the annual general appropriation act. Expenditures from custodial money do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the
State Constitution. Appropriations from the Consumer Credit Unit Cash Fund are shown for informational purposes only because they are continuously appropriated pursuant Section
5-2-302 (11)(a), C.R.S. and appropriations from the Student Loan Ombudsperson and Student Loan Servicer Licensing Fund are shown for informational purposes only as they are
continuously appropriated pursuant to Section 5-20-104 (3)(c), C.R.S.
(6) SPECIAL PURPOSE
District Attorneys' Salaries 2,943,586 2,943,586
Deputy District Attorney
Training 350,000 350,000
District Attorney
Assistance for Bond
Hearings Grants 600,000 600,000
Litigation Management 200,000 200,000a
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1160

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Tobacco Litigation 100,000 100,000b
CORA OML Attorney 116,580 116,580
(1.0 FTE)
4,310,166
a This amount shall be from either excess earnings credited to the Legal Services Cash Fund created in Section 24-31-108 (4), C.R.S., or from the Attorney Fees and Costs Account created
pursuant to Section 24-31-108 (3), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from the Tobacco Settlement Defense Account of the Tobacco Litigation Settlement Cash Fund created in Section 24-22-115 (2)(a), C.R.S. Expenditures from
the Tobacco Settlement Defense Account of the Tobacco Litigation Settlement Cash Fund do not constitute fiscal year spending for the purposes of Section 20 of Article X of the State
Constitution.
TOTALS PART XI
(LAW) $151,919,365 $28,669,324 $25,514,253a $93,800,797b $3,934,991c
$151,394,766 $28,507,306 $25,457,593a $93,500,033b $3,929,834c
a Of this amount, $5,461,334 contains an (I) notation.
b Of this amount, $307,461 contains an (I) notation.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- The following statements are referenced to the numbered footnotes throughout section 2.
68 Department of Law, Legal Services to State Agencies -- In making this appropriation, it is the General Assembly's intent that hourly billing rates charged by
the Department for legal services to state agencies not exceed $145.70 per hour for attorneys and not exceed $97.68 per hour for legal assistants, which equates
to a blended legal rate of $138.47 per hour.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1160

SECTION 2. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1160